Utah statutes.
19-8-119.   Apportionment or contribution.

(1)  Any party who incurs costs under a voluntary agreement entered into under this part in excess of his liability may seek contribution in an action in district court from any other party who is or may be liable under Subsection 19-6-302(21) or 19-6-402(26) for the excess costs after providing written notice to any other party that the party bringing the action has entered into a voluntary agreement and will incur costs.

(2)  In resolving claims made under Subsection (1), the court shall allocate costs using the standards in Subsection 19-6-310(2).

